Utah statutes.
58-37c-19.5.   Iodine solution greater than 1.5% -- Prescription or permit
required -- Penalties.
(1)  As used in this section, "iodine matrix" means iodine at concentrations
greater than 1.5% by weight in a matrix or solution.
(2)  A person may offer to sell, sell, or distribute an iodine matrix only:
(a)  as a prescription drug, pursuant to a prescription issued by a
veterinarian or physician licensed within the state; or
(b)  to a person who is actively engaged in the legal practice of animal
husbandry of livestock, as defined in Section 4-1-8.
(3)  Prescriptions issued under this section:
(a)  shall provide for a specified number of refills;
(b)  may be issued by electronic means, in accordance with Title 58, Chapter
17b, Pharmacy Practice Act; and
(c)  may be filled by a person other than the veterinarian or physician
issuing the prescription.
(4)  A retailer offering iodine matrix for sale:
(a)  shall store the iodine matrix so that the public does not have access to
the iodine matrix without the direct assistance or intervention of a retail
employee;
(b)  shall keep a record, which may consist of sales receipts, of each person
purchasing iodine matrix; and
(c)  may, if necessary to ascertain the identity of the purchaser, ask for
proof of identification from the purchaser.
(5)  A person engaging in a regulated transaction under Subsection (2) is
guilty of a class B misdemeanor if the person, under circumstances not
amounting to a violation of Subsection 58-37d-4(1)(c), offers to sell, sells,
or distributes an iodine matrix to a person who:
(a)  does not present a prescription or is not engaged in animal husbandry, as
required under Subsection (2); or
(b)  is not excepted under Subsection (7).
(6)  A person is guilty of a class A misdemeanor who, under circumstances not
amounting to a violation of Subsection 58-37c-3(12)(k) or 58-37d-4(1)(a):
(a)  possesses an iodine matrix without proof of obtaining the solution in
compliance with Subsection (2); or
(b)  offers to sell, sells, or distributes an iodine matrix in violation of
Subsection (2).
(7)  Subsection (6)(a) does not apply to:
(a)  a chemistry or chemistry-related laboratory maintained by:
(i)  a public or private regularly established secondary school; or
(ii)  a public or private institution of higher education that is accredited
by a regional or national accrediting agency recognized by the United States
Department of Education;
(b)  a veterinarian licensed to practice under Title 58, Chapter 28,
Veterinary Practice Act;
(c)  a general acute hospital; or
(d)  a veterinarian, physician, pharmacist, retail distributor, wholesaler,
manufacturer, warehouseman, or common carrier, or an agent of any of these
persons who possesses an iodine matrix in the regular course of lawful
business activities.
